Florida, session 2026, SB1178.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 118 119 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âForeign 120 Interference Restriction and Enforcement Act.â 121 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (c) through (g) of subsection 122 (2) of section 11.045, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 123 paragraphs (d) through (h), respectively, and a new paragraph 124 (c) is added to that subsection, to read: 125 11.045âLobbying before the Legislature; registration and 126 reporting; exemptions; penalties.â 127 (2)âEach house of the Legislature shall provide by rule, or 128 may provide by a joint rule adopted by both houses, for the 129 registration of lobbyists who lobby the Legislature. The rule 130 may provide for the payment of a registration fee. The rule may 131 provide for exemptions from registration or registration fees. 132 The rule shall provide that: 133 (c)1.âRegistration must include whether each principal 134 represented is: 135 a.âA foreign country of concern; or 136 b.âA domestic partnership, an association, a corporation, 137 an organization, or any other business entity that is at least 138 25 percent beneficially owned by a foreign country of concern, a 139 nonresident alien from a foreign country of concern, or an 140 entity organized under the laws of or having its principal place 141 of business in a foreign country of concern. 142 2.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âforeign country of 143 concernâ has the same meaning as in s. 286.101(1). 144 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 63.213, Florida 145 Statutes, is amended to read: 146 63.213âPreplanned adoption agreement.â 147 (2)(a)âA preplanned adoption agreement is prohibited unless 148 all of the following apply: 149 1.âThe volunteer mother is a United States citizen or 150 lawful permanent resident. 151 2.âEach intended parent is a United States citizen or 152 lawful permanent resident and at least one intended parent is 153 domiciled in Florida. 154 (b)âA preplanned adoption agreement must include, but need 155 not be limited to, the following terms: 156 1.(a)âThat the volunteer mother agrees to become pregnant 157 by the fertility technique specified in the agreement, to bear 158 the child, and to terminate any parental rights and 159 responsibilities to the child she might have through a written 160 consent executed at the same time as the preplanned adoption 161 agreement, subject to a right of rescission by the volunteer 162 mother any time within 48 hours after the birth of the child, if 163 the volunteer mother is genetically related to the child. 164 2.(b)âThat the volunteer mother agrees to submit to 165 reasonable medical evaluation and treatment and to adhere to 166 reasonable medical instructions about her prenatal health. 167 3.(c)âThat the volunteer mother acknowledges that she is 168 aware that she will assume parental rights and responsibilities 169 for the child born to her as otherwise provided by law for a 170 mother if the intended father and intended mother terminate the 171 agreement before final transfer of custody is completed, if a 172 court determines that a parent clearly specified by the 173 preplanned adoption agreement to be the biological parent is not 174 the biological parent, or if the preplanned adoption is not 175 approved by the court pursuant to the Florida Adoption Act. 176 4.(d)âThat an intended father who is also the biological 177 father acknowledges that he is aware that he will assume 178 parental rights and responsibilities for the child as otherwise 179 provided by law for a father if the agreement is terminated for 180 any reason by any party before final transfer of custody is 181 completed or if the planned adoption is not approved by the 182 court pursuant to the Florida Adoption Act. 183 5.(e)âThat the intended father and intended mother 184 acknowledge that they may not receive custody or the parental 185 rights under the agreement if the volunteer mother terminates 186 the agreement or if the volunteer mother rescinds her consent to 187 place her child for adoption within 48 hours after the birth of 188 the child, if the volunteer mother is genetically related to the 189 child. 190 6.(f)âThat the intended father and intended mother may 191 agree to pay all reasonable legal, medical, psychological, or 192 psychiatric expenses of the volunteer mother related to the 193 preplanned adoption arrangement and may agree to pay the 194 reasonable living expenses and wages lost due to the pregnancy 195 and birth of the volunteer mother and reasonable compensation 196 for inconvenience, discomfort, and medical risk. No other 197 compensation, whether in cash or in kind, shall be made pursuant 198 to a preplanned adoption arrangement. 199 7.(g)âThat the intended father and intended mother agree to 200 accept custody of and to assert full parental rights and 201 responsibilities for the child immediately upon the childâs 202 birth, regardless of any impairment to the child. 203 8.(h)âThat the intended father and intended mother shall 204 have the right to specify the blood and tissue typing tests to 205 be performed if the agreement specifies that at least one of 206 them is intended to be the biological parent of the child. 207 9.(i)âThat the agreement may be terminated at any time by 208 any of the parties. 209 Section 4.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 112.313, 210 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 211 112.313âStandards of conduct for public officers, employees 212 of agencies, and local government attorneys.â 213 (1)âDEFINITIONS DEFINITION.âAs used in this section, unless 214 the context otherwise requires, the term: 215 (a)ââDesignated foreign terrorist organizationâ has the 216 same meaning as in s. 775.32(1). 217 (b)ââForeign country of concernâ has the same meaning as in 218 s. 286.101(1). 219 (c)ââPublic officerâ includes any person elected or 220 appointed to hold office in any agency, including any person 221 serving on an advisory body. 222 (2)âSOLICITATION OR ACCEPTANCE OF GIFTS.â 223 (a)âA No public officer, an employee of an agency, a local 224 government attorney, or a candidate for nomination or election 225 may not shall solicit or accept anything of value to the 226 recipient, including a gift, loan, reward, promise of future 227 employment, favor, or service, based upon any understanding that 228 the vote, official action, or judgment of the public officer, 229 employee, local government attorney, or candidate would be 230 influenced thereby. 231 (b)âA public officer, an employee of an agency, a local 232 government attorney, or a candidate for nomination or election 233 may not solicit or accept anything of value to the recipient, 234 including a gift, loan, reward, promise of future employment, 235 favor, or service, for any purpose, from a designated foreign 236 terrorist organization, a foreign country of concern or any of 237 its subdivisions, or any person or entity representing or acting 238 on behalf of a designated foreign terrorist organization or 239 foreign country of concern or any of its subdivisions. 240 Section 5.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 241 112.3142, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 242 112.3142âEthics training for specified constitutional 243 officers, elected municipal officers, commissioners of community 244 redevelopment agencies, and elected local officers of 245 independent special districts.â 246 (2) 247 (e)âThe commission shall adopt rules establishing minimum 248 course content for the portion of an ethics training class which 249 addresses s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution and the Code 250 of Ethics for Public Officers and Employees. By November 1, 251 2026, the commission shall adopt revised rules to supplement the 252 minimum course content, which content must include all of the 253 following: 254 1.âKnown efforts by foreign countries of concern to target 255 and influence subnational governments, including, but not 256 limited to, the Chinese Communist Partyâs United Front strategy. 257 2.âHow to identify, recognize, and report suspected foreign 258 influence campaigns. 259 3.âProhibitions on receiving gifts from foreign countries 260 of concern as defined in s. 286.101(1) or designated foreign 261 terrorist organizations as defined in s. 775.32(1). 262 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 112.3215, Florida 263 Statutes, is amended to read: 264 112.3215âLobbying before the executive branch or the 265 Constitution Revision Commission; registration and reporting; 266 investigation by commission.â 267 (3)âA person may not lobby an agency until such person has 268 registered as a lobbyist with the commission. Such registration 269 shall be due upon initially being retained to lobby and is 270 renewable on a calendar year basis thereafter. Upon registration 271 the person shall provide a statement signed by the principal or 272 principalâs representative that the registrant is authorized to 273 represent the principal. The principal shall also identify and 274 designate its main business on the statement authorizing that 275 lobbyist pursuant to a classification system approved by the 276 commission. The registration shall require each lobbyist to 277 disclose, under oath, the following information: 278 (a)âName and business address; 279 (b)âThe name and business address of each principal 280 represented; 281 (c)â1.âWhether each principal represented is: 282 a.âA foreign country of concern; or 283 b.âA domestic partnership, an association, a corporation, 284 an organization, or any other business entity that is at least 285 25 percent beneficially owned by a foreign country of concern, a 286 nonresident alien from a foreign country of concern, or an 287 entity organized under the laws of or having its principal place 288 of business in a foreign country of concern. 289 2.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âforeign country of 290 concernâ has the same meaning as in s. 286.101(1); 291 (d)âHis or her area of interest; 292 (e)(d)âThe agencies before which he or she will appear; and 293 (f)(e)âThe existence of any direct or indirect business 294 association, partnership, or financial relationship with any 295 employee of an agency with which he or she lobbies, or intends 296 to lobby, as disclosed in the registration. 297 Section 7.âPresent paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (2) 298 of section 112.3261, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 299 paragraphs (d) and (e), respectively, and a new paragraph (c) is 300 added to that subsection, to read: 301 112.3261âLobbying before water management districts; 302 registration and reporting.â 303 (2)âA person may not lobby a district until such person has 304 registered as a lobbyist with that district. Such registration 305 shall be due upon initially being retained to lobby and is 306 renewable on a calendar-year basis thereafter. Upon 307 registration, the person shall provide a statement signed by the 308 principal or principalâs representative stating that the 309 registrant is authorized to represent the principal. The 310 principal shall also identify and designate its main business on 311 the statement authorizing that lobbyist pursuant to a 312 classification system approved by the district. Any changes to 313 the information required by this section must be disclosed 314 within 15 days by filing a new registration form. The 315 registration form shall require each lobbyist to disclose, under 316 oath, the following: 317 (c)1.âWhether each principal represented is: 318 a.âA foreign country of concern; or 319 b.âA domestic partnership, an association, a corporation, 320 an organization, or any other business entity that is at least 321 25 percent beneficially owned by a foreign country of concern, a 322 nonresident alien from a foreign country of concern, or an 323 entity organized under the laws of or having its principal place 324 of business in a foreign country of concern. 325 2.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âforeign country of 326 concernâ has the same meaning as in s. 286.101(1). 327 Section 8.âSection 205.0532, Florida Statutes, is amended 328 to read: 329 205.0532âRevocation or refusal to renew; doing business 330 with Cuba.â 331 (1)âAny appropriate tax collector or local governing 332 authority issuing a business tax receipt to any individual, 333 business, or entity under this chapter may revoke or refuse to 334 renew such receipt if the individual, business, or entity, or 335 parent company of such individual, business, or entity, is doing 336 business with Cuba in violation of federal law. 337 (2)âAny appropriate tax collector or local governing 338 authority may request a sworn affidavit or declaration from any 339 individual, business, or entity attesting to whether the 340 individual, business, or entity is doing business with Cuba in 341 violation of federal law. 342 (3)âA person who knowingly makes a false declaration under 343 subsection (2) is guilty of the crime of perjury by false 344 written declaration, a felony of the third degree, punishable as 345 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 346 Section 9.âSection 287.138, Florida Statutes, is amended to 347 read: 348 287.138âContracting with entities of foreign sources 349 countries of concern prohibited.â 350 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 351 (a)ââControlling interestâ means possession of the power to 352 direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a 353 company, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, 354 or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or indirectly has 355 the right to vote 25 percent or more of the voting interests of 356 the company or is entitled to 25 percent or more of its profits 357 is presumed to possess a controlling interest. 358 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Management 359 Services. 360 (b)(c)ââForeign source country of concernâ has the same 361 meaning as in s. 496.404 means the Peopleâs Republic of China, 362 the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 363 Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, the 364 Venezuelan regime of NicolÃ¡s Maduro, or the Syrian Arab 365 Republic, including any agency of or any other entity of 366 significant control of such foreign country of concern. 367 (c)(d)ââGovernmental entityâ means any state, county, 368 district, authority, or municipal officer, department, division, 369 board, bureau, commission, or other separate unit of government 370 created or established by law including, but not limited to, the 371 Commission on Ethics, the Public Service Commission, the Office 372 of Public Counsel, and any other public or private agency, 373 person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting on 374 behalf of any public agency. 375 (d)ââInformation technologyâ has the same meaning as in s. 376 282.0041. 377 (2)(a)âA governmental entity may not knowingly enter into a 378 contract with a foreign source of concern if the contract an 379 entity which would give access to an individualâs personal 380 identifying information. 381 (b)âA governmental entity may not knowingly enter into a 382 contract for information technology with a foreign source of 383 concern, or through a third-party seller when the information 384 technology is designed, manufactured, or assembled by a foreign 385 source of concern, or for any services relating to information 386 technology with a foreign source of concern if: 387 (a)âThe entity is owned by the government of a foreign 388 country of concern; 389 (b)âThe government of a foreign country of concern has a 390 controlling interest in the entity; or 391 (c)âThe entity is organized under the laws of or has its 392 principal place of business in a foreign country of concern. 393 (3)âBeginning July 1, 2026 2025, a governmental entity may 394 not extend or renew a contract with a foreign source of concern 395 an entity listed in paragraphs (2)(a)-(c) if the contract would 396 give such foreign source of concern entity access to an 397 individualâs personal identifying information or if the contract 398 involves information technology. 399 (4)(a)âBeginning July 1, 2026 January 1, 2024, a 400 governmental entity may not accept a bid on, a proposal for, or 401 a reply to, or enter into, a contract with an entity which would 402 grant the entity access to an individualâs personal identifying 403 information or involve information technology unless the entity 404 provides the governmental entity with an affidavit signed by an 405 officer or representative of the entity under penalty of perjury 406 attesting that the entity is not a foreign source of concern 407 does not meet any of the criteria in paragraphs (2)(a)-(c). 408 (b)âBeginning July 1, 2026 2025, when an entity extends or 409 renews a contract with a governmental entity which would grant 410 the entity access to an individualâs personal identifying 411 information or which involves information technology, the entity 412 must provide the governmental entity with an affidavit signed by 413 an officer or representative of the entity under penalty of 414 perjury attesting that the entity is not a foreign source of 415 concern does not meet any of the criteria in paragraphs (2)(a) 416 (c). 417 (5)(a)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 418 a governmental entity may enter into, extend, or renew a 419 contract involving information technology which is otherwise 420 prohibited by this section if the department makes a written 421 determination that: 422 1.âThere is no reasonable alternative available to address 423 a specific need. 424 2.âFailure to enter into the contract would pose a greater 425 risk to public health, public safety, or economic security than 426 the risk associated with entering into the contract. 427 3.âThe contract includes mitigation measures deemed 428 necessary by the department to reduce any risk to this state. 429 (b)âBeginning January 1, 2027, the department shall submit 430 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 431 the House of Representatives a written quarterly report 432 detailing each contract entered into pursuant to this 433 subsection. 434 (6)(a)âThis section does not apply to information 435 technology that is incapable of remote access to or control of 436 critical infrastructure. 437 (b)âThe department may create a nonexhaustive list of 438 information technology that violates this section. 439 (c)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 440 section. 441 (7)(5)âThe Attorney General may bring a civil action in any 442 court of competent jurisdiction against an entity that violates 443 this section. Violations of this section may result in: 444 (a)âA civil penalty equal to twice the amount of the 445 contract for which the entity submitted a bid or proposal for, 446 replied to, or entered into; 447 (b)âIneligibility to enter into, renew, or extend any 448 contract, including any grant agreements, with any governmental 449 entity for up to 5 years; 450 (c)âIneligibility to receive or renew any license, 451 certification, or credential issued by a governmental entity for 452 up to 5 years; and 453 (d)âPlacement on the suspended vendor list pursuant to s. 454 287.1351. 455 (8)(6)âAny penalties collected under subsection (7) (5) 456 must be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. 457 (9)(7)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 458 section, including rules establishing the form for the affidavit 459 required under subsection (4). 460 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 461 288.816, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (7) is 462 added to that section, to read: 463 288.816âIntergovernmental relations.â 464 (3)âThe state protocol officer may: 465 (a)âCoordinate and carry out activities designed to 466 encourage the state and its subdivisions to participate in 467 sister city and sister state affiliations with foreign countries 468 and their subdivisions. Such activities may include a State of 469 Florida sister cities conference. Such activities may not 470 include encouragement of any affiliation with foreign countries 471 of concern as defined in s. 288.860(1) or their subdivisions. 472 (7)âThe department shall publish on its website, to be 473 updated quarterly, the following information: 474 (a)âA current and accurate list of all foreign consulate 475 offices. 476 (b)âA current and accurate list of all sister city and 477 sister state affiliations, including a copy of all such 478 agreements. 479 Section 11.âSubsections (3), (4), and (5) of section 480 288.8175, Florida Statutes, are amended, and a new subsection 481 (7) is added to that section, to read: 482 288.8175âLinkage institutes between postsecondary 483 institutions in this state and foreign countries.â 484 (3)âEach institute must be co-administered in this state by 485 a university-community college partnership, as designated in 486 subsection (5), and must have a private sector and public sector 487 advisory committee. The advisory committee must be 488 representative of the international education and commercial 489 interests of the state and may have members who are native to 490 the foreign country partner. Six members must be appointed by 491 the Department of Education. The Department of Education must 492 appoint at least one member who is an international educator. 493 The presidents, or their designees, of the participating 494 university and community college must also serve on the advisory 495 committee. 496 (4)âThe institutes are: 497 (a)âFlorida-Brazil Institute (University of Florida and 498 Miami Dade College). 499 (b)âFlorida-Costa Rica Institute (Florida State University 500 and Valencia College). 501 (c)âFlorida Caribbean Institute (Florida International 502 University and Daytona State College). 503 (d)âFlorida-Canada Institute (University of Central Florida 504 and Palm Beach State College). 505 (e)âFlorida-China Institute (University of West Florida, 506 University of South Florida, and Eastern Florida State College). 507 (f)âFlorida-Japan Institute (University of South Florida, 508 University of West Florida, and St. Petersburg College). 509 (f)(g)âFlorida-France Institute (New College of the 510 University of South Florida, Miami Dade College, and Florida 511 State University). 512 (g)(h)âFlorida-Israel Institute (Florida Atlantic 513 University and Broward College). 514 (h)(i)âFlorida-West Africa Institute (Florida Agricultural 515 and Mechanical University, University of North Florida, and 516 Florida State College at Jacksonville). 517 (i)(j)âFlorida-Eastern Europe Institute (University of 518 Central Florida and Lake-Sumter State College). 519 (j)(k)âFlorida-Mexico Institute (Florida International 520 University and Polk State College). 521 (5)âEach institute is allowed to exempt from s. 1009.21 up 522 to 25 full-time equivalent students per year from the respective 523 host countries to study in any of the state universities or 524 community colleges in this state as resident students for 525 tuition purposes. The institute directors shall develop 526 criteria, to be approved by the Department of Education, for the 527 selection of these students. Students must return home within 3 528 years after their tenure of graduate or undergraduate study for 529 a length of time equal to their exemption period. 530 (7)âA linkage institute may not enter into any agreement or 531 participate in any activities with a foreign country of concern 532 as defined in s. 288.860(1) or any organization in a foreign 533 country of concern. 534 Section 12.âPresent subsection (4) of section 288.854, 535 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), and a new 536 subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 537 288.854âSupport for a free and independent Cuba.â 538 (4)(a)âIf the Federal Government changes the diplomatic 539 status of Cuba, the Governor may, by executive order, suspend 540 the provisions of any statute or rule restricting interactions 541 with Cuba for a period not to exceed adjournment sine die of the 542 regular session of the Legislature after such suspension. A 543 suspension expires upon adjournment sine die of such regular 544 session of the Legislature. A suspension may not be renewed or 545 extended. 546 (b)âIf the Governor suspends a statute or rule under 547 paragraph (a), he or she may not subsequently suspend the same 548 statute or rule relating to Cuba unless expressly authorized by 549 the Legislature. 550 (c)âAt least 30 days before the next regular session of the 551 Legislature following a change in Cubaâs diplomatic status by 552 the Federal Government, the Governor shall submit to the 553 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 554 Representatives written recommendations for policy changes, if 555 any, that should be considered by the Legislature concerning 556 Cuba. However, if the change in Cubaâs diplomatic status occurs 557 within 30 days before the convening of the next regular session 558 of the Legislature or during the regular session of the 559 Legislature, the Governor shall submit such recommendations as 560 soon as practicable. 561 (d)âThis subsection is repealed October 2, 2028, unless 562 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 563 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 288.860, Florida 564 Statutes, is amended to read: 565 288.860âInternational cultural agreements.â 566 (2)(a)âA state agency, political subdivision, or public 567 school authorized to expend state-appropriated funds or levy ad 568 valorem taxes may not participate in any agreement with or 569 accept any grant from a foreign country of concern or its 570 subdivisions, or any entity controlled by a foreign country of 571 concern. 572 (b)âAll agreements under paragraph (a), including, but not 573 limited to, sister city agreements, are terminated as of July 1, 574 2026, which: 575 (a)âConstrains the freedom of contract of such public 576 entity; 577 (b)âAllows the curriculum or values of a program in the 578 state to be directed or controlled by the foreign country of 579 concern; or 580 (c)âPromotes an agenda detrimental to the safety or 581 security of the United States or its residents. Before the 582 execution of any cultural exchange agreement with a foreign 583 country of concern, the substance of the agreement must be 584 shared with federal agencies concerned with protecting national 585 security or enforcing trade sanctions, embargoes, or other 586 restrictions under federal law. If such federal agency provides 587 information suggesting that such agreement promotes an agenda 588 detrimental to the safety or security of the United States or 589 its residents, the public entity may not enter into the 590 agreement. 591 Section 14.âSubsection (1) of section 316.0078, Florida 592 Statutes, is amended to read: 593 316.0078âProhibition on contracting for camera systems of 594 vendors of foreign countries of concern.â 595 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: terms 596 (a)ââControlling interestâ means possession of the power to 597 direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a 598 company, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, 599 or otherwise. A person or an entity that directly or indirectly 600 has 25 percent or more of the voting interests of a company or 601 is entitled to 25 percent or more of its profits is presumed to 602 possess a controlling interest. and 603 (b)ââForeign country of concernâ means the Peopleâs 604 Republic of China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic 605 of Iran, the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, the Republic 606 of Cuba, the Venezuelan regime of NicolÃ¡s Maduro, or the Syrian 607 Arab Republic, including any agency of or any other entity of 608 significant control of such foreign country of concern have the 609 same meanings as in s. 287.138(1). 610 Section 15.âSubsection (14) of section 496.404, Florida 611 Statutes, is amended to read: 612 496.404âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 496.401-496.424, the 613 term: 614 (14)ââForeign source of concernâ means any of the 615 following: 616 (a)âThe government or any official of the government of a 617 foreign country of concern; 618 (b)âA political party or member of a political party or any 619 subdivision of a political party in a foreign country of 620 concern; 621 (c)âA partnership, an association, a corporation, an 622 organization, or other combination of persons organized under 623 the laws of or having its principal place of business in a 624 foreign country of concern, or a subsidiary of such entity; 625 (d)âAny person who is domiciled in a foreign country of 626 concern and is not a citizen or lawful permanent citizen of the 627 United States; 628 (e)âAn agent, including a subsidiary or an affiliate of a 629 foreign legal entity, acting on behalf of a foreign source of 630 concern; or 631 (f)âAn entity in which a person, entity, or collection of 632 persons or entities described in paragraphs (a)-(e) has a 633 controlling interest. As used in this paragraph, the term 634 âcontrolling interestâ means the possession of the power to 635 direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of 636 an entity, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, 637 or otherwise. A person or an entity that directly or indirectly 638 has the right to vote 25 percent or more of the voting interest 639 of the company or is entitled to 25 percent or more of its 640 profits is presumed to possess a controlling interest; or 641 (g)âA designated foreign terrorist organization as defined 642 in s. 775.32(1) or an agent acting on behalf of a designated 643 foreign terrorist organization. 644 Section 16.âSubsection (3) of section 692.201, Florida 645 Statutes, is amended to read: 646 692.201âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 647 (3)ââForeign country of concernâ means the Peopleâs 648 Republic of China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic 649 of Iran, the Democratic Peopleâs Republic of Korea, the Republic 650 of Cuba, the Venezuelan regime of NicolÃ¡s Maduro, or the Syrian 651 Arab Republic, including any agency of or any other entity under 652 of significant control of such foreign country of concern. 653 Section 17.âSection 692.21, Florida Statutes, is created to 654 read: 655 692.21âProtection of state critical infrastructure 656 facilities from foreign sources of concern.â 657 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 658 (a)ââBusiness entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 659 112.312. 660 (b)ââForeign source of concernâ has the same meaning as in 661 s. 496.404. 662 (c)ââGovernmental entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 663 287.138(1). 664 (d)ââInformation technologyâ has the same meaning as in s. 665 282.0041. 666 (2)(a)âA governmental entity or a business entity 667 constructing, repairing, operating, or otherwise having 668 significant access to a critical infrastructure facility may not 669 enter into a contract or other agreement relating to a critical 670 infrastructure facility in this state with a foreign source of 671 concern if the contract or agreement authorizes the foreign 672 source of concern to directly or remotely access or otherwise 673 control such critical infrastructure facility. 674 (b)âA foreign source of concern may not enter into a 675 contract or other agreement relating to critical infrastructure 676 facilities in this state with a business entity constructing, 677 repairing, operating, or otherwise having significant access to 678 critical infrastructure facilities, or a governmental entity, if 679 the contract or agreement authorizes the foreign source of 680 concern to directly or remotely access or otherwise control such 681 critical infrastructure facility. 682 (3)(a)âBeginning January 1, 2027, a business entity 683 constructing, repairing, operating, or otherwise having 684 significant access to a critical infrastructure facility in this 685 state which entered into a contract or other agreement before 686 July 1, 2026, with a foreign source of concern relating to such 687 critical infrastructure facility must register with the 688 Department of Commerce by January 1 of each year for the 689 remainder of the term of the contract or agreement with the 690 foreign source of concern relating to such critical 691 infrastructure facility. The Department of Commerce shall adopt 692 a registration form that includes all of the following: 693 1.âThe name of the business entity constructing, repairing, 694 operating, or otherwise having significant access to critical 695 infrastructure facilities in this state. 696 2.âThe address of the critical infrastructure facility the 697 business entity is constructing, repairing, or operating or to 698 which the business entity otherwise has significant access. 699 3.âA description of the specific terms of the contract or 700 agreement which authorize a foreign source of concern to engage 701 in constructing, repairing, or operating or to otherwise have 702 significant access to such critical infrastructure facility. 703 (b)âA business entity that violates paragraph (a): 704 1.âIs subject to a civil penalty of $1,000 for each day the 705 violation continues. 706 2.âCommits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable 707 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 708 (4)âBefore commencing any sale or other transfer of control 709 of a critical infrastructure facility in this state, the 710 business entity selling or otherwise transferring control of 711 such critical infrastructure facility must provide an affidavit, 712 signed under penalty of perjury, to the Department of Commerce 713 attesting that the buyer or transferee is not a foreign source 714 of concern. 715 (5)(a)âInformation technology produced or manufactured by a 716 foreign source of concern may not be used in a critical 717 infrastructure facility located in this state. 718 (b)1.âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), a governmental entity 719 or business entity may enter into a contract or other agreement 720 with a foreign source of concern to use information technology 721 that is otherwise prohibited in paragraph (a) in a critical 722 infrastructure facility if the Department of Commerce, in 723 consultation with the Department of Management Services, makes a 724 written determination that: 725 a.âThere is no reasonable alternative available to address 726 a specific need relating to a critical infrastructure facility 727 in this state. 728 b.âFailure to enter into the contract or agreement would 729 pose a greater risk to public health, public safety, or economic 730 security than the risk associated with entering into the 731 contract or agreement. 732 c.âThe contract or agreement includes mitigation measures 733 deemed necessary by the Department of Commerce, in consultation 734 with the Department of Management Services, to reduce any risk 735 to this state. 736 2.âBeginning January 1, 2027, the Department of Commerce 737 shall submit to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 738 the Speaker of the House of Representatives a written quarterly 739 report detailing each contract or agreement entered into 740 pursuant to this paragraph. 741 (c)âThis subsection does not apply to information 742 technology that is incapable of remote access to or control of 743 critical infrastructure. 744 (6)âThe Department of Commerce shall adopt rules to 745 implement this section. 746 Section 18.âSubsection (1) of section 742.15, Florida 747 Statutes, is amended to read: 748 742.15âGestational surrogacy contract.â 749 (1)âPrior to engaging in gestational surrogacy, a binding 750 and enforceable gestational surrogacy contract shall be made 751 between the commissioning couple and the gestational surrogate. 752 A contract for gestational surrogacy is prohibited shall not be 753 binding and enforceable unless all of the following apply: 754 (a)âThe gestational surrogate is 18 years of age or older 755 and is a United States citizen or lawful permanent resident. 756 (b)âThe commissioning couple are legally married, and are 757 both 18 years of age or older, are domiciled in Florida, and are 758 United States citizens or lawful permanent residents. 759 Section 19.âSection 775.08255, Florida Statutes, is created 760 to read: 761 775.08255âOffenses by foreign agents; reclassification.â 762 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 763 (a)ââAgent of a foreign government or designated foreign 764 terrorist organizationâ means a person acting on behalf of or 765 otherwise employed or controlled by a foreign government or a 766 designated foreign terrorist organization. 767 (b)ââDesignated foreign terrorist organizationâ has the 768 same meaning as in s. 775.32(1). 769 (c)ââForeign governmentâ has the same meaning as in s. 770 286.101(1). 771 (2)âThe penalty for any misdemeanor or felony may be 772 reclassified if the commission of such misdemeanor or felony was 773 for the purpose of benefiting, promoting, or furthering the 774 interests of a foreign government, a designated foreign 775 terrorist organization, or an agent of a foreign government or 776 designated foreign terrorist organization. The reclassification 777 is as follows: 778 (a)âA misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a 779 misdemeanor of the first degree. 780 (b)âA misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a 781 felony of the third degree. 782 (c)âA felony of the third degree is reclassified to a 783 felony of the second degree. 784 (d)âA felony of the second degree is reclassified to a 785 felony of the first degree. 786 (e)âA felony of the first degree is reclassified to a life 787 felony. 788 (3)âIn addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, a 789 person convicted of a felony of the first degree or a life 790 felony under this section shall be sentenced to a minimum term 791 of imprisonment of 15 years. 792 Section 20.âSection 775.36, Florida Statutes, is created to 793 read: 794 775.36âUnauthorized enforcement of foreign law.â 795 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 796 (a)ââAgent of a foreign government or designated foreign 797 terrorist organizationâ means a person acting on behalf of or 798 otherwise employed or controlled by a foreign government or a 799 designated foreign terrorist organization. 800 (b)ââDesignated foreign terrorist organizationâ has the 801 same meaning as in s. 775.32(1). 802 (c)ââForeign governmentâ has the same meaning as in s. 803 286.101(1). 804 (2)âWithout the approval of the state or the United States, 805 a person may not: 806 (a)âPrevent another person in this state from violating the 807 laws of a foreign government which are not also the laws of this 808 state or the United States; or 809 (b)âInvestigate, monitor, or surveil another person in this 810 state for the purpose of preventing the other person from 811 violating the laws of a foreign government which are not also 812 the laws of this state or the United States. 813 (3)âA person who violates this section commits a felony of 814 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 815 775.083, or s. 775.084. However, a person who violates this 816 section for the purpose of benefiting, promoting, or furthering 817 the interests of a foreign government, a designated foreign 818 terrorist organization, or an agent of a foreign government or 819 designated foreign terrorist organization commits a felony of 820 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 821 775.083, or s. 775.084. 822 Section 21.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 823 282.802, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 824 282.802âGovernment Technology Modernization Council.â 825 (7)(a)âThe council shall meet at least quarterly to: 826 1.âRecommend legislative and administrative actions that 827 the Legislature and state agencies as defined in s. 282.318(2) 828 may take to promote the development of data modernization in 829 this state. 830 2.âAssess and provide guidance on necessary legislative 831 reforms and the creation of a state code of ethics for 832 artificial intelligence systems in state government. 833 3.âAssess the effect of automated decision systems or 834 identity management on constitutional and other legal rights, 835 duties, and privileges of residents of this state. 836 4.âEvaluate common standards for artificial intelligence 837 safety and security measures, including the benefits of 838 requiring disclosure of the digital provenance for all images 839 and audio created using generative artificial intelligence as a 840 means of revealing the origin and edit of the image or audio, as 841 well as the best methods for such disclosure. 842 5.âAssess the manner in which governmental entities and the 843 private sector are using artificial intelligence with a focus on 844 opportunity areas for deployments in systems across this state. 845 6.âDetermine the manner in which artificial intelligence is 846 being exploited by bad actors, including foreign countries of 847 concern as defined in s. 286.101(1) s. 287.138(1). 848 7.âEvaluate the need for curriculum to prepare school-age 849 audiences with the digital media and visual literacy skills 850 needed to navigate the digital information landscape. 851 Section 22.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.